Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3765.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ELY; WATER INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $3,919,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Ely to design, construct, and equip upgrades to and the replacement of water infrastructure in the city of Ely. This appropriation includes money for the replacement of raw water intake and pump house infrastructure on Burntside Lake; the rehabilitation and replacement of water main infrastructure throughout the city; installation of new pumps, automated controls, and remote monitoring systems; replacement of associated deteriorated bridge crossings; and major projects at the Ely water treatment plant, including roof replacement, HVAC upgrades, and the installation of solar energy infrastructure. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $3,919,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end